Virginia statutes. Title 28.2. Fisheries and Habitat of the Tidal Waters
Article 3. Inventories of Certain Ungranted Shores of the Sea, Marsh and Meadowlands.

§ 28.2-1507.
Notice of filing of inventories.

The Commission shall cause to be published, within ninety days following the effective date of this section, in a newspaper of general circulation published at the state capital, in a newspaper having general circulation in the counties where the initial inventories have been filed, and in such other newspapers in the Commonwealth as the Commission generally publishes notices pursuant to §

2.2-4007.03

, a notice of the filing of the initial inventories. The notice shall state that any person claiming ownership of an interest in lands designated in an initial inventory as ungranted shores of the sea, marsh or meadowlands is required to assert the claim as provided in §

28.2-1509

within two years following the effective date of this section, or any action to assert such claim shall be barred.

The Commission shall cause to be published a notice of the filing of any amended or supplemental inventory in a newspaper having general circulation in the county for which such amended or supplemental inventory applies. The notice shall refer to the initial inventory and any previous amended or supplemental inventory with respect thereto, and shall state that any person claiming ownership of an interest in lands designated therein as ungranted shores of the sea, marsh or meadowlands is required to assert the claim as provided in §

28.2-1509

within two years following the filing of the amended or supplemental inventory, or any action to assert such claim shall be barred.

The failure of the Commission to comply with the requirements of this section shall not impair the Commonwealth’s rights of ownership in any ungranted shores of the sea, marsh, or meadowlands.

History.

1995, c. 850; 2007, cc. 873, 916.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 873 and 916 are identical, and substituted “§

2.2-4007

.03” for “subsection F of §

2.2-4007

” in the first sentence of subsection A.

§ 28.2-1508.
Effect of inventories.

The failure to include any ungranted shores of the sea, marsh or meadowlands in an initial inventory shall not affect the Commonwealth’s rights of ownership in such property.

History.

1995, c. 850.